Washington statutes.
RCW 26.04.080

Marriage certificate—Contents.

The person solemnizing a marriage shall give to each of the parties thereto, if required, a certificate thereof, specifying therein the names and residence of the parties, and of at least two witnesses present, the time and place of such marriage, and the date of the license thereof, and by whom issued.

[Code 1881 s 2384; 1866 p 82 s 6; RRS s 8444.]